test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_izhichigewin_gt-norm.yaml
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: izhichigewinenhiminaanan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: izhichigewinenhiminaanag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: izhichigewinenhiminaaning
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: izhichigewinenhimiwaaan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: izhichigewinenhimiwaaag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: izhichigewinenhimiwaaing
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: izhichigewinenhiminian
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: izhichigewinenhiminiag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: izhichigewinenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinensimibanan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinensimibanag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinensimibaning
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinensim***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinensim***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinensim***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinenhimibanan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinenhimibanag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinenhimibaning
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinenhim***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinenhim***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: izhichigewinensishinaaniban
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: izhichigewinensishinaan***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: izhichigewinensishiwaaiban
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: izhichigewinensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: izhichigewinensishiniiban
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: izhichigewinensishini***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: izhichigewinenhishinaaniban
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: izhichigewinenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: izhichigewinenhishiwaaiban
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: izhichigewinenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: izhichigewinenhishiniiban
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: izhichigewinenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: izhichigewinensishinaanan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: izhichigewinensishinaanag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: izhichigewinensishinaaning
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: izhichigewinensishiwaaan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: izhichigewinensishiwaaag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: izhichigewinensishiwaaing
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: izhichigewinensishinian
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: izhichigewinensishiniag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: izhichigewinensishiniing
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: izhichigewinenhishinaanan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: izhichigewinenhishinaanag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: izhichigewinenhishinaaning
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: izhichigewinenhishiwaaan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: izhichigewinenhishiwaaag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: izhichigewinenhishiwaaing
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: izhichigewinenhishinian
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: izhichigewinenhishiniag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: izhichigewinenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinensishibanan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinensishibanag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinensishibaning
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinensish***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinensish***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinensish***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinenhishibanan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinenhishibanag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinenhishibaning
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinenhish***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinenhish***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinensinaanibanan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinensinaanibanag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinensinaanibaning
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinensinaan***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinensiwaaibanan
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinensiwaaibanag
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinensiwaaibaning
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinensiniibanan
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinensiniibanag
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinensiniibaning
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinensini***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinensini***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinensini***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinenhinaanibanan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinenhinaanibanag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinenhinaanibaning
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinenhiwaaibanan
     izhichigewin+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinenhiwaaibanag
     izhichigewin+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinenhiwaaibaning
     izhichigewin+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinenhiniibanan
     izhichigewin+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinenhiniibanag
     izhichigewin+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinenhiniibaning
     izhichigewin+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinenhini***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinenhini***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: izhichigewinimishinaaniban
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: izhichigewinimishinaan***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: izhichigewinimishiwaaiban
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: izhichigewinimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: izhichigewinimishiniiban
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: izhichigewinimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: izhichigewinimishinaanan
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: izhichigewinimishinaanag
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: izhichigewinimishinaaning
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: izhichigewinimishiwaaan
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: izhichigewinimishiwaaag
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: izhichigewinimishiwaaing
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: izhichigewinimishinian
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: izhichigewinimishiniag
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: izhichigewinimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinimishibanan
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinimishibanag
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinimishibaning
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinimish***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinimish***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: izhichigewiniminaanibanan
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: izhichigewiniminaanibanag
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: izhichigewiniminaanibaning
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinimiwaaibanan
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinimiwaaibanag
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinimiwaaibaning
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: izhichigewiniminiibanan
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: izhichigewiniminiibanag
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: izhichigewiniminiibaning
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinimini***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinimini***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinishinaanibanan
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinishinaanibanag
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinishinaanibaning
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinishiwaaibanan
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinishiwaaibanag
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinishiwaaibaning
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinishiniibanan
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinishiniibanag
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinishiniibaning
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinishini***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niizhichigewinensimishinaan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niizhichigewinensimishiwaa
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niizhichigewinensimishini
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niizhichigewinenhimishinaan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niizhichigewinenhimishiwaa
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niizhichigewinenhimishini
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giizhichigewinensimishinaan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giizhichigewinensimishiwaa
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giizhichigewinensimishini
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giizhichigewinenhimishinaan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giizhichigewinenhimishiwaa
